Arkansas, session 2025, SB219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-57-1507 is repealed.
26-57-1507. Sunset.
This subchapter shall expire on July 1, 2025, unless extended by the
General Assembly.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current special privilege
tax on medical marijuana expires on July 1, 2025; that the General Assembly
intends to continue levying the special privilege tax on medical marijuana;
and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure the uninterrupted,
consistent, and efficient administration and imposition of the special
privilege tax on medical marijuana. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
*JLL196*
02/12/2025 10:12:31 AM JLL196

SB219
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.































02/12/2025 10:12:31 AM JLL196